Utah statutes.
63M-1-1224.   Exemption from certain statutes.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this part, the corporation is exempt from
statutes governing state agencies, as provided in Section 63E-2-109.
(2)  The corporation is exempt from:
(a)  Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act; and
(b) Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.
(3)  The board is exempt from the requirement to report fund performance of
venture firms and private equity firms set forth in Title 63G, Chapter 2,
Government Records Access and Management Act.
